test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NA_CW_jooweshk_gt-glossing.yaml
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gjooweshkoonyshiwaabniing
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gjooweshkoonyshiwaabniig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gjooweshkoonsshinaanbaniin
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gjooweshkoonsshinaanbaniing
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gjooweshkoonsshinaanbaniig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gjooweshkoonsshiwaabniin
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gjooweshkoonsshiwaabniing
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gjooweshkoonsshiwaabniig
     3+jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: jooweshkoonyshiwaabniin
     3+jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: jooweshkoonyshiwaabniing
     3+jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: jooweshkoonyshinwibniin
     3+jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: jooweshkoonyshinwibniing
     3+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: jooweshkoonsshiwaabniin
     3+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: jooweshkoonsshiwaabniing
     3+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: jooweshkoonsshinwibniin
     3+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: jooweshkoonsshinwibniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: njooweshkmishnaanbaniin
     1+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: njooweshkmishnaanbaniing
     1+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: njooweshkmishnaanbaniig
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gjooweshkmishnaanbaniin
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gjooweshkmishnaanbaniing
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gjooweshkmishnaanbaniig
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gjooweshkmishwaabniin
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gjooweshkmishwaabniing
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gjooweshkmishwaabniig
     3+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: jooweshkmishwaabniin
     3+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: jooweshkmishwaabniing
     3+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: jooweshkmishniwbaniin
     3+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: jooweshkmishniwbaniing
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: njooweshkoonymishnaanbaniin
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: njooweshkoonymishnaanbaniing
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: njooweshkoonymishnaanbaniig
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: njooweshkoonsmishnaanbaniin
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: njooweshkoonsmishnaanbaniing
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: njooweshkoonsmishnaanbaniig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gjooweshkoonymishnaanbaniin
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gjooweshkoonymishnaanbaniing
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gjooweshkoonymishnaanbaniig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gjooweshkoonymishwaabniin
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gjooweshkoonymishwaabniing
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gjooweshkoonymishwaabniig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gjooweshkoonsmishnaanbaniin
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gjooweshkoonsmishnaanbaniing
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gjooweshkoonsmishnaanbaniig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gjooweshkoonsmishwaabniin
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gjooweshkoonsmishwaabniing
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gjooweshkoonsmishwaabniig
     3+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: jooweshkoonymishwaabniin
     3+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: jooweshkoonymishwaabniing
     3+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: jooweshkoonymishniwbaniin
     3+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: jooweshkoonymishniwbaniing
     3+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: jooweshkoonsmishwaabniin
     3+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: jooweshkoonsmishwaabniing
     3+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: jooweshkoonsmishniwbaniin
     3+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: jooweshkoonsmishniwbaniing
     
